Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1508.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3093 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This section shall be known and may be cited as the


“Compassionate Access to Medical Marijuana Act”.


B. As used in this section:


1. “Health care facility” means a facility licensed by the


State Department of Health, but shall not include a hospital that is


owned or operated by the state or a state agency, the federal

Req. No. 2650 Page 1


government, a federally recognized Indian tribe, or the Indian


Health Service;


2. “Medical marijuana” means medical marijuana or medical


marijuana products used in compliance with Section 420 et seq. of


Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


3. “Terminally ill” means a medical condition resulting in a


prognosis of life of one (1) year or less, if the disease follows


its natural course.


C. A health care facility shall permit the use of medical


marijuana by a patient who is terminally ill and who is a licensed


patient as defined in Section 427.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes and shall do all of the following:


1. Prohibit smoking or vaping as methods to use medical


marijuana;


2. Include the use of medical marijuana within the patient’s


medical records;


3. Require the patient to provide a copy of the patient’s valid


medical marijuana patient license issued by the Oklahoma Medical


Marijuana Authority;


4. Reasonably restrict the manner in which a patient stores and


uses medical marijuana, including requiring the medical marijuana to


be stored in a locked container, to ensure the safety of other


patients, guests, and employees of the health care facility,



Req. No. 2650 Page 2


compliance with other state laws, and the safe operations of the


health care facility; and


5. Develop and disseminate written guidelines for the use of


medical marijuana within the health care facility pursuant to this


section.


D. This section does not apply to a patient receiving emergency


services and care or to the emergency department of a health care


facility while the patient is receiving emergency services and care.


E. Notwithstanding the classification of medical marijuana as a


Schedule I drug and any other law, a health care facility shall


comply with drug and medication requirements applicable to Schedule


II, III, and IV drugs and shall be subject to enforcement actions by


the State Department of Health.


F. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:


1. Require a health care facility to provide a patient with a


recommendation to use medical marijuana under Section 420 et seq. of


Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes or include medical marijuana in a


patient’s discharge plan; or


2. Reduce, expand, or otherwise modify the laws governing the


cultivation, possession, sale, or use of marijuana that may be


otherwise applicable, including, but not limited to, Section 420 et


seq. of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.





Req. No. 2650 Page 3


G. Compliance with this section shall not be a condition for


obtaining, retaining, or renewing a license as a health care


facility.


H. If a federal agency takes one of the following actions, a


health care facility may suspend compliance with this section until


the federal agency notifies the health care facility that it may


resume permitting the use of medical marijuana within the facility:


1. A federal agency initiates an enforcement action against a


health care facility related to the facility’s compliance with this


section; and


2. A federal agency issues a rule or otherwise provides


notification to the health care facility that expressly prohibits


the use of medical marijuana in health care facilities or otherwise


prohibits compliance with this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2650 DC 1/9/2026 11:39:31 PM















Req. No. 2650 Page 4